Wyoming, session 2025, HB0323.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 42-2-115 is created to read:

42-2-115. Supplemental nutrition assistance program;
waiver; definitions.

(a) As used in this section:

(i) "Candy" means a preparation of sugar, honey
or other natural or artificial sweeteners in combination
HB0323

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0798
with chocolate, fruit, nuts or other ingredients or
flavorings in the form of bars, drops or pieces;

(ii) "Soft drink" means a nonalcoholic beverage
that contains natural or artificial sweeteners. "Soft
drink" shall not include a beverage that contains milk,
milk products, soy, rice or similar milk substitutes or a
beverage that is greater than fifty percent (50%) vegetable
or fruit juice by volume.

(b) Not later than July 1, 2025, the director of the
department of family services shall request a waiver from
the United States department of agriculture to exclude
candy and soft drinks from the definition of eligible foods
under 7 C.F.R. § 271.2. If the waiver is granted, the
director of the department of family services shall
prohibit the purchase of candy and soft drinks with
benefits provided under the supplemental nutrition
assistance program. If no waiver is granted, the director
of the department of family services shall repeat the
request for a waiver annually until the waiver is granted.

HB0323

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0798
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0323